California, session 20252026, AB2290.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2025.550 of the Code of Civil Procedure is amended to read:2025.550. (a) The certified transcript of a deposition shall not be filed with the court. Instead, the deposition officer shall securely seal that transcript in an envelope or package endorsed with the title of the action and marked: “Deposition of (here insert name of deponent),” and shall promptly transmit it to the attorney for the party who noticed the deposition. Upon request of the attorney for the party who noticed the deposition, the deposition officer may instead securely transmit the transcript electronically in an encrypted format to that attorney. This The electronic transcript shall be in a format that enables the attorney and the court to verify that the transcript is authentic and has not been altered after it was certified by the deposition officer. The attorney shall store the transcript under conditions that will protect it against loss, destruction, or tampering. When presenting an electronically stored transcript to a court for any purpose, the attorney shall certify that the transcript is a true and correct copy of the transcript received electronically pursuant to this subdivision, and the transcript shall be admissible as an original transcript.(b) The attorney to whom the transcript of a deposition is transmitted shall retain custody of it until six months after final disposition of the action. At that time, the transcript may be destroyed, unless the court, on motion of any party and for good cause shown, orders that the transcript be preserved for a longer period.